incubator/apertium-pl-sk/dev/sk-nouns.dix
    <pardef n="burž/oa__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ou</l>
        <r>oa<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uovi</l>
        <r>oa<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ou</l>
        <r>oa<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uovi</l>
        <r>oa<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oa</l>
        <r>oa<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uom</l>
        <r>oa<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oa</l>
        <r>oa<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uov</l>
        <r>oa<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uom</l>
        <r>oa<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uov</l>
        <r>oa<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uoch</l>
        <r>oa<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uovia</l>
        <r>oa<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oami</l>
        <r>oa<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uovia</l>
        <r>oa<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m/zda__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>iezd</l>
        <r>zda<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>zd</l>
        <r>zda<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="vyvýšenin/ka__SG"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>zd</l>
        <r>zda<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="žbrnd/a__BASEPL"/> 
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="on/uca__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>úc</l>
        <r>uca<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uc</l>
        <r>uca<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__Gambia"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uc</l>
        <r>uca<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="guč/a__BASEPL"/> 
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="buch/ta__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ál</l>
        <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>iek</l>
        <r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>t</l>
        <r>ta<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="vyvýšenin/ka__SG"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>t</l>
        <r>ta<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="žbrnd/a__BASEPL"/> 
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="rí/ňa__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ň</l>
        <r>ňa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r>ňa<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="kapuc/ňa__BASESG"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r>ňa<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="chlebár/eň__BASEPL"/> 
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mí/ľa__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľ</l>
        <r>ľa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r>ľa<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="drumb/ľa__BASESG"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r>ľa<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="dia/ľ__BASEPL"/> 
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sp/rcha__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ŕch</l>
        <r>rcha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rch</l>
        <r>rcha<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="vyvýšenin/ka__SG"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rch</l>
        <r>rcha<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="žbrnd/a__BASEPL"/> 
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="š/ľacha__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>liach</l>
        <r>ľacha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľach</l>
        <r>ľacha<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="vyvýšenin/ka__SG"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ľach</l>
        <r>ľacha<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="žbrnd/a__BASEPL"/> 
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="k/ura__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>úr</l>
        <r>ura<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uraťa</l>
        <r>ura<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uraťu</l>
        <r>ura<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ura</l>
        <r>ura<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>urati</l>
        <r>ura<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ura</l>
        <r>ura<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uraťom</l>
        <r>ura<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ura</l>
        <r>ura<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ureniec</l>
        <r>ura<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>urencom</l>
        <r>ura<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>urence</l>
        <r>ura<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>urencoch</l>
        <r>ura<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>urence</l>
        <r>ura<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>urencami</l>
        <r>ura<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>urence</l>
        <r>ura<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ur</l>
        <r>ura<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="vyvýšenin/ka__SG"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ur</l>
        <r>ura<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="žbrnd/a__BASEPL"/> 
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="šk/umpa__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>úmp</l>
        <r>umpa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ump</l>
        <r>umpa<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="vyvýšenin/ka__SG"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ump</l>
        <r>umpa<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="žbrnd/a__BASEPL"/> 
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="c/ica__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>íc</l>
        <r>ica<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ic</l>
        <r>ica<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__Gambia"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ic</l>
        <r>ica<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="guč/a__BASEPL"/> 
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="k/oza__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ôz</l>
        <r>oza<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oz</l>
        <r>oza<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="vyvýšenin/ka__SG"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>oz</l>
        <r>oza<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="žbrnd/a__BASEPL"/> 
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="buchta"><i>buch</i><par n="buch/ta__n"/></e>
    <e lm="buržoa"><i>burž</i><par n="burž/oa__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cica"><i>c</i><par n="c/ica__n"/></e>
    <e lm="chvíľa"><i>chví</i><par n="mí/ľa__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kura"><i>k</i><par n="k/ura__n"/></e>
    <e lm="koza"><i>k</i><par n="k/oza__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mrcha"><i>m</i><par n="sp/rcha__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mzda"><i>m</i><par n="m/zda__n"/></e>
    <e lm="meľa"><i>me</i><par n="mí/ľa__n"/></e>
    <e lm="míľa"><i>mí</i><par n="mí/ľa__n"/></e>
    <e lm="onuca"><i>on</i><par n="on/uca__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ríňa"><i>rí</i><par n="rí/ňa__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sprcha"><i>sp</i><par n="sp/rcha__n"/></e>
    <e lm="šľacha"><i>š</i><par n="š/ľacha__n"/></e>
    <e lm="škumpa"><i>šk</i><par n="šk/umpa__n"/></e>
    <e lm="žumpa"><i>ž</i><par n="šk/umpa__n"/></e>
